North Dakota, session 69, SB2138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES - GRANT
FUNDING FOR ORGANIZATIONS PROVIDING CARE FOR THE ELDERLY. There is appropriated out
of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of
$200,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of health and human
services for the purpose of providing grant funding to organizations that provide care to the elderly in
rural areas of the state, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. Of the
grant funding provided under this section, $100,000 must be provided to existing organizations
providing care to elderly individuals in rural areas of the state and $100,000 must be provided to
organizations to provide services to elderly individuals in one or more rural counties in the state which
do not currently have these services for elderly individuals.

S. B. NO. 2138 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2138.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
House Vote: Yeas 84 Nays 6 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State